Idaho, session 2025, H0294.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 61-712A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
61-712A. CIVIL PENALTY FOR VIOLATION. Any person who violates or fails
to comply with, or who procures, aids, or abets any violation of title 61,
Idaho Code, governing safety of pipeline facilities and the transportation
of gas, or of any order, decision, rule, or regulation duly issued by the
Idaho public utilities commission governing the safety of pipeline facili-
ties and the transportation of gas, shall be subject to a civil penalty of not
to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000) for each violation for each day that
the violation persists. However, the maximum civil penalty shall not exceed
two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) for any related series of violation
pursuant to 49 CFR 190.223 at the time the violation occurred.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.